Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202660-1435
Franchise; appeal.

Any party to a hearing before the board, or hearing officer employed by the board, may appeal any final order entered in such hearing, and the appeal shall be in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act.

Laws 1971, LB 768, § 35;

Laws 1988, LB 352, § 108;

Laws 2022, LB1148, § 7.

Administrative Procedure Act, see section 84-920.